Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.815

Hydroplane races—Levying of admission charges declared public park purpose—Reversion prohibited.

It is hereby declared to be a legitimate public park purpose for any city or town to levy an admission charge for spectators to view hydroplane races from park property. Property which has been conveyed to a city or town by the state for exclusive use in the city's or town's public park system or exclusively for public park, parkway, and boulevard purposes shall not revert to the state upon the levying of admission fees authorized in RCW 35.21.810.

[ 1979 c 26 s 2.]